dev/monodix/result.id.dix
    <pardef n="pemeraga-pemeraga__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemeraga-pemeraganya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemeraga__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemeraganya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pengusaha-pengusaha__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pengusaha-pengusahanya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penyearah-penyearah__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penyearah-penyearahnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penyearah__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penyearahnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pengusaha__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pengusahanya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perbahasaan-perbahasaan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perbahasaan-perbahasaannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perbahasaan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perbahasaannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pelajar-pelajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pelajar-pelajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pelajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pelajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kata-kata__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kata-katanya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="akhiran-akhiran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="san"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="akhiran-akhirannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="san"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="akhiran__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="san"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="akhirannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="san"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kata__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="katanya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Maria__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Indonesia__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Yakobus__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dua__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berdua__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="coll"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kedua__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keduanya__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adalah__part">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="part"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dari__pr">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="pr"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ini__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berapa__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sana__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kami__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="saya__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kalian__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kamu__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mereka__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dia__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ku__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="seseorang__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="yang__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="rel"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baca__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengalir__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengalirkan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="India"><i>India</i><par n="Indonesia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Perancis"><i>Perancis</i><par n="Indonesia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Maria"><i>Maria</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mary"><i>Mary</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Leo"><i>Leo</i><par n="Yakobus__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Yesus"><i>Yesus</i><par n="Yakobus__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ialah"><i>ialah</i><par n="adalah__part"/></e>
    <e lm="lapis"><p><l>lapisan-lapisan</l><r>lapis</r></p><par n="akhiran-akhiran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tindak"><p><l>tindakan-tindakan</l><r>tindak</r></p><par n="akhiran-akhiran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jalan"><p><l>jalanan</l><r>jalan</r></p><par n="akhiran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puluh"><p><l>puluhan</l><r>puluh</r></p><par n="akhiran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hari"><p><l>hariannya</l><r>hari</r></p><par n="akhirannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kendara"><p><l>kendaraannya</l><r>kendara</r></p><par n="akhirannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rangkap"><i>rangkap</i><par n="baca__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mana"><i>mana</i><par n="berapa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tujuh"><p><l>bertujuh</l><r>tujuh</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="untuk"><i>untuk</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ia"><i>ia</i><par n="dia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="seperenam"><i>seperenam</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="itu"><i>itu</i><par n="ini__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kalian"><i>kalian</i><par n="kalian__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kita"><i>kita</i><par n="kami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kau"><i>kau</i><par n="kamu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kapal"><p><l>kapal-kapal</l><r>kapal</r></p><par n="kata-kata__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sel"><p><l>sel-sel</l><r>sel</r></p><par n="kata-kata__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karya"><p><l>karya-karyanya</l><r>karya</r></p><par n="kata-katanya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="orang"><p><l>orang-orangnya</l><r>orang</r></p><par n="kata-katanya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kelamin"><i>kelamin</i><par n="kata__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saraf"><i>saraf</i><par n="kata__n"/></e>
    <e lm="harta"><p><l>hartanya</l><r>harta</r></p><par n="katanya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="makna"><p><l>maknanya</l><r>makna</r></p><par n="katanya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sepuluh"><p><l>kesepuluh</l><r>sepuluh</r></p><par n="kedua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="aku"><p><l>ku</l><r>aku</r></p><par n="ku__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tembak"><p><l>menembak</l><r>tembak</r></p><par n="mengalir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="temu"><p><l>menemukan</l><r>temu</r></p><par n="mengalirkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mereka"><i>mereka</i><par n="mereka__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="rancang"><p><l>perancang</l><r>rancang</r></p><par n="pelajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rencana"><p><l>perencana</l><r>rencana</r></p><par n="pelajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kerja"><p><l>pekerjanya</l><r>kerja</r></p><par n="pelajarnya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuasa"><p><l>penguasa-penguasa</l><r>kuasa</r></p><par n="pengusaha-pengusaha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peran"><p><l>pemeran-pemerannya</l><r>peran</r></p><par n="pengusaha-pengusahanya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ikat"><p><l>pengikat</l><r>ikat</r></p><par n="pengusaha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puja"><p><l>pemuja</l><r>puja</r></p><par n="pengusaha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guna"><p><l>penggunanya</l><r>guna</r></p><par n="pengusahanya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tutur"><p><l>penuturnya</l><r>tutur</r></p><par n="pengusahanya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soal"><p><l>persoalan-persoalan</l><r>soal</r></p><par n="perbahasaan-perbahasaan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="usaha"><p><l>perusahaan-perusahaan</l><r>usaha</r></p><par n="perbahasaan-perbahasaan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="helat"><p><l>perhelatan</l><r>helat</r></p><par n="perbahasaan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="minyak"><p><l>perminyakan</l><r>minyak</r></p><par n="perbahasaan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kerja"><p><l>pekerjaannya</l><r>kerja</r></p><par n="perbahasaannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rasa"><p><l>perasaannya</l><r>rasa</r></p><par n="perbahasaannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="situ"><i>situ</i><par n="sana__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="saya"><i>saya</i><par n="saya__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ketiga-tiganya"><i>ketiga-tiganya</i><par n="seseorang__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="yang"><i>yang</i><par n="yang__rel"/></e>
